Florida, session 2026, HB825.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 110.221, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
110.221 Parental or family medical leave.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Family" means a child, parent, or spouse., and the
term
(b) "Family medical leave" means leave requested by an
employee for a serious family illness including an accident,
disease, or condition that poses imminent danger of death,
requires hospitalization involving an organ transplant, limb
amputation, or other procedure of similar severity, or any
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb825-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 825 2026
mental or physical condition that requires constant in-home
care.
(c) "Paid parental leave" means fully paid leave for the
father or mother of a child who is born to or adopted by that
parent.
(d) The term "Parental leave" means leave for the father
or mother of a child who is born to or adopted by that parent.
(2) The state shall provide 12 weeks of paid parental
leave to any employee in the career service following the birth
or adoption of a child by the employee. The state may not
require such employee to use his or her annual leave or sick
leave during the initial 12-week period. The employee is
entitled to accumulate all benefits granted under paid leave
status.
(3) The state may shall not:
(a) Terminate the employment of any employee in the career
service because of the pregnancy of the employee or the
employee's spouse or the adoption of a child by that employee.
(b) Refuse to grant to a career service employee:
1. Paid parental leave; or
2. Parental or family medical leave without pay for a
period not to exceed 6 months. Such leave shall commence on a
date that is determined by the employee in consultation with the
attending physician following notification to the employer in
writing, and that is approved by the employer.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb825-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 825 2026
(c) Deny a career service employee the use of and payment
for annual leave credits for parental or family medical leave.
Such leave shall commence on a date determined by the employee
in consultation with the attending physician following
notification to the employer in writing.
(d) Deny a career service employee the use of and payment
for accrued sick leave or family sick leave for any reason
deemed necessary by a physician or as established by policy.
(e) Require that a career service employee take a
mandatory parental or family medical leave.
(4)(3) Upon returning at the end of parental or family
medical leave of absence, such employee shall be reinstated to
the same job or to an equivalent position with equivalent pay
and with seniority, retirement, fringe benefits, and other
service credits accumulated prior to the leave period. If any
portion of the parental or family medical leave is paid leave,
the employee shall be entitled to accumulate all benefits
granted under paid leave status.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb825-00